Wyoming, session 2026, SF0022.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 17-22-106(b), (c) and (d),
17-32-102(a)(i), (iii)(intro), (A), (C), (vi) through (ix),
by creating a new paragraph (xiv) and by renumbering (xiv)
as (xv), 17-32-104(a), (b), (c)(i) and (iii), 17-32-106(a),
(b) and (c)(ii) through (iv), 17-32-107(b) through (e),
17-32-108(b)(i) and (ii), 17-32-109, 17-32-110(b)(ii),
17-32-111, 17-32-112, 17-32-113(a)(i), 17-32-114(b)(i)
through (iii), 17-32-115(a), 17-32-116(a), 17-32-117(a),
17-32-119, 17-32-120(c), 17-32-121(b)(i), 17-32-122(a)(ii),
17-32-123(a), (d)(intro), (ii) and (iv), 17-32-124(a) and
(c), 17-32-125(a) through (d), 17-32-126(a), (b)(i),
(ii)(A), (B), (D) and (iii), 17-32-127(a) by creating a new
paragraph (vii), (c)(iii), (v)(B) and (d)(viii) and
17-32-128 are amended to read:
17-22-106. Liability in tort and contract.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0022
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(b) A person is not liable for a breach of a
nonprofit association's contract merely solely because the
person is a member, is authorized to participate in the
management of the affairs of the nonprofit association or
is a person considered as a member by the nonprofit
association.
(c) A person is not liable for a tortious act or
omission for which a nonprofit association is liable merely
solely because the person is a member, is authorized to
participate in the management of the affairs of the
nonprofit association or is a person considered as a member
by the nonprofit association.
(d) A tortious act or omission of a member or other
person for which a nonprofit association is liable is not
imputed to a person merely solely because the person is a
member of the nonprofit association, is authorized to
participate in the management of the affairs of the
nonprofit association or is a person considered as a member
by the nonprofit association.
17-32-102. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(i) "Administrator" means a person, whether or
not a member, authorized by the members membership of a
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association to
fulfill administrative or operational tasks at the
direction of the membership of the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association;
(iii) "Decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association" or "nonprofit association" means an
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0022
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
unincorporated nonprofit association that meets the
following requirements:
(A) Consists of at least one hundred (100)
members joined by mutual consent under an agreement, that
may be in writing or inferred from conduct, for a common
nonprofit purpose; except as permitted under W.S.
17-32-104;
(C) Is not formed under any other law
governing the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association's organization or operation.
(vi) "Established practices" means the practices
used by a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association without material change during the most recent
five (5) years of the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association's existence, or if the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association has existed for less
than five (5) years, during the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association's entire existence;
(vii) "Governing principles" means all
agreements and any amendment or restatement of those
agreements, including any decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association agreements, consensus formation
algorithms, smart contracts or enacted governance
proposals, that govern the purpose or operation of a
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association and the
rights and obligations of the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association's members and administrators, whether
contained in a record, implied from the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association's established
practices or both;
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0022
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(viii) "Member" means a person who, under the
governing principles of a decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association, may participate in the selection of
the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association's
administrators or the development of the policies and
activities of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association;
(ix) "Membership interest" means a member's
voting right in a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association determined by the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association's governing principles, including as
ascertained from decentralized ledger technology on which
the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association
relies to determine a member's voting right;
(xiv) "Distributed ledger protocol" means an
executable software deployed to a distributed ledger
including smart contracts or networks of smart contracts;
(xiv)(xv) "This act" means W.S. 17-32-101
through 17-32-128 17-32-129.
17-32-104. Profits; prohibitions on distributions and
dividends; compensation and other permitted payments.
(a) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association may engage in profit-making activities, but
profits from any activities shall be used in furtherance
of, or set aside for, the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association's common nonprofit purpose.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this
section, a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association may not pay dividends or distribute any part of
4

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0022
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
its income or profits to its members or administrators or
persons outside the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association.
(c) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association may:
(i) Pay reasonable compensation or reimburse
reasonable expenses to its members, administrators and
persons outside the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association for services rendered, including with respect
to the administration and operation of the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association, which may include the
provisions of collateral for the self-insurance of the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association, voting
or participation in the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association's operations and activities;
(iii) Repurchase membership interests to the
extent authorized by the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association's governing principles; and
17-32-106. Statement of authority as to real
property.
(a) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association shall execute and record a statement of
authority to transfer an estate or interest in real
property in the name of the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association.
(b) An estate or interest in real property in the
name of a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association may be transferred by a person so authorized in
a statement of authority recorded in the office of the
5

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0022
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
county clerk in which a transfer of the property will would
be recorded.
(c) A statement of authority shall set forth:
(ii) The address in this state, including the
street address, if any, of the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association. If the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association does not have an address in this
state, the statement of authority shall include the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association's
address out of state;
(iii) The name or title of the person authorized
to transfer an estate or interest in real property held in
the name of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association; and
(iv) The action, procedure or vote of the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association which
authorizes the person to transfer the real property of the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association and
which authorizes the person to execute the statement of
authority.
17-32-107. Liability in tort or contract.
(b) A person is not liable for a breach of a
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association's
contract merely because the person is a member,
administrator, authorized to participate in the management
of the affairs of the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association or considered as a member by the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association.
6

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0022
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(c) A person is not liable for a tortious act or
omission for which a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association is liable merely because the person is a member
or administrator of the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association, or is a person authorized to
participate in the management of the affairs of the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association or
considered as a member by the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association.
(d) A tortious act or omission of a member,
administrator or other person for which a decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association is liable is not
imputed to a person merely because the person is a member
or administrator of the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association, or is a person authorized to
participate in the management of the affairs of the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association or
considered as a member by the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association.
(e) A member, administrator, person authorized to
participate in the management of the affairs of the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association, or
person considered as a member by the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association, may assert a claim
against the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association. A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association may assert a claim against a member,
administrator, person authorized to participate in the
management of the affairs of the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association or person considered
as a member by the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association.
7

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0022
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
17-32-108. Capacity to assert and defend; standing.
(b) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association may assert a claim on behalf of its members if:
(i) One (1) or more members of the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association have standing to
assert a claim in their own right;
(ii) The interests the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association seeks to protect are
germane to its purposes; and
17-32-109. Effect of judgement or order.
A judgment or order against a decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association is not by itself a judgment or order
against a member or administrator of the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association.
17-32-110. Appointment of agent to receive service of
process.
(b) A statement appointing an agent shall set forth:
(ii) The address in this state, including the
street address, if any, of the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association. If the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association does not have an address in this
state, the statement shall include the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association's address out of
state; and
17-32-111. Summons and complaint; service on whom.
8

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0022
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
In an action or proceeding against a decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association, a summons and
complaint shall be served on an agent authorized to receive
service of process or a person authorized to administer the
affairs of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association. If none of them can be served, service may be
made on a member of the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association.
17-32-112. Claim not abated by change of members,
administrators or persons authorized.
A claim for relief against a decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association shall not abate merely because of a
change in its members or persons authorized to administer
the affairs of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association.
17-32-113. Venue.
(a) For purposes of venue, a decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association is a resident of a
county in which:
(i) The decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association has an office; or
17-32-114. Perpetual existence, dissolution,
continuation of existence.
(b) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association may be dissolved by any of the following
methods:
9

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0022
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(i) If the governing principles of the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association provide
a time or method for dissolution, by that method;
(ii) If the governing principles of the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association do not
provide a method for dissolution, by approval of its
members in accordance with W.S. 17-32-120;
(iii) If membership in the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association falls below one
hundred (100) members and the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association does not meet the requirements of a
Wyoming unincorporated nonprofit association under W.S.
17-22-101 through 17-22-115. In the event membership in the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association falls
below one hundred (100) members and the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association meets the requirements
of a Wyoming unincorporated nonprofit association under
W.S. 17-22-101 through 17-22-115, the entity automatically
converts to a Wyoming unincorporated nonprofit association
unless the governing principles otherwise specify; another
organizational statute and the organization meets the
statutory requirements of that organization;
17-32-115. Admission, suspension, dismissal or
expulsion of members.
(a) A person becomes a member of a decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association in accordance with the
governing principles of the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association. If there are no applicable governing
principles, a person shall be considered a member upon
purchase or assumption of ownership of a membership
interest or other property or instrument that confers a
10

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0022
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
voting right with the nonprofit association and the person
shall continue as a member absent until the person's
suspension, dismissal or expulsion pursuant to subsection
(b) of this section, resignation pursuant to W.S. 17-32-116
or the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association's
dissolution and wind-up pursuant to W.S. 17-32-114 and W.S.
17-32-126.
17-32-116. Member resignation.
(a) A member may resign as a member of a
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association in
accordance with the governing principles of the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association. If
there are no applicable governing principles, a member
shall be deemed to have resigned as a member upon the
disposal, whether voluntary or involuntary, of all
membership interests or other property or instruments that
confer upon the person a voting right within the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association.
17-32-117. Duties of members.
(a) Unless otherwise provided for in the governing
principles, a member shall not have any fiduciary duty to a
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association or to
any other member of the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association solely by reason of being a member.
17-32-119. Member interests transferable.
Except as otherwise provided in the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association's governing
principles, a member interest or any right thereunder is
freely transferable to another person through conveyance of
11

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0022
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
the membership interest. or other property that confers
upon a person a voting right within the nonprofit
association.
17-32-120. Approval by members.
(c) Unless otherwise provided for in the governing
principles, membership interest in a decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association shall be calculated in
proportion to a member's voting rights within the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association.
17-32-121. Utilization of distributed ledger
technology.
(b) The governing principles for a decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association may:
(i) Specify whether any distributed ledger
technology utilized or enabled by the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association will be fully
immutable or subject to change by the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association and whether any
distributed ledger will be fully or partially public or
private, including the extent of a member's access to
information;
17-32-122. Consensus formation algorithms and
governance process.
(a) In accordance with its governing principles, a
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association may:
(ii) In accordance with any procedure specified
pursuant to W.S. 17-32-121, modify the consensus mechanism,
12

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0022
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
as well as the requirements, processes and procedures or
substitute a new consensus mechanism, requirements,
processes or procedures that comply with this state's law
and the governing principles of the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association.
17-32-123. Selection of administrators; rights and
duties of administrators.
(a) Unless otherwise provided for in the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association's
governing principles, the members of a decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association may select the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association's
administrators in accordance with W.S. 17-32-120.
(d) If in a record, the governing principles of a
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association may
limit or eliminate the liability of an administrator to the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association or its
members for money damages for any action taken, or failure
to take any action, as an administrator except liability
for:
(ii) An intentional infliction of harm on the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association or its
members;
(iv) Breach of the duty of loyalty should one
exist, unless, following full disclosure of all material
facts to the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association members, the specific act or transaction that
would otherwise breach the duty of loyalty is authorized or
ratified by approval of the disinterested members pursuant
to W.S. 17-32-120;
13

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0022
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
17-32-124. Right to inspect records.
(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, on reasonable notice, a member or administrator of
a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association shall
be entitled to an electronic record of any record
maintained by the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association regarding the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association's activities, financial condition and
other circumstances, to the extent the information is
material to a member or administrator's rights and duties
under the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association's governing principles or this act.
(c) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association may impose reasonable restrictions on access to
and use of information that may be provided under this
section, including by designating the information
confidential and imposing nondisclosure or other
safeguarding obligations on the recipient of the
information. In a dispute concerning the reasonableness of
a restriction under this subsection, the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association shall have the burden
of proving reasonableness.
17-32-125. Indemnification; advancement of expenses.
(a) Unless otherwise provided in its governing
principles, a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association may reimburse a member or administrator for
authorized expenses reasonably incurred on behalf of the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association.
14

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0022
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(b) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association may indemnify a member or administrator for any
debt, obligation or other liability incurred in the course
of the member or administrator's activities on behalf of
the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association. To
be eligible for indemnification, an administrator must have
complied with the duties stated in W.S. 17-32-123. If in a
record, a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association's governing principles may broaden or limit
this right of indemnification.
(c) If a person is made, or threatened to be made, a
party in a proceeding based on that person's conduct in the
affairs of a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association, that person is entitled, upon written request
to the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association,
including through decentralized ledger technology, to
receive payment of or reimbursement by the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association, of reasonable
expenses, including attorney's fees and disbursements,
incurred by that person in advance of the final disposition
of the proceeding. To be entitled to these payments or
advances the person making the request shall make a written
affirmation that the person has a good faith belief that
the criteria for indemnification in subsection (a) of this
section have been satisfied and that the person will repay
the amounts paid or reimbursed if it is determined that the
criteria for reimbursement have not been satisfied. No
payment or reimbursement under this subsection shall be
made without prior approval, in a record, of the
disinterested members under W.S. 17-32-102.
(d) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf
of a member or administrator for liability asserted against
15

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0022
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
or incurred by the member or administrator in that
capacity, whether or not the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association would have the power to indemnify or
advance expenses to the member or administrator against the
same liability under this section.
17-32-126. Winding up; termination.
(a) A dissolved decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association shall wind up its operations and the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association shall
continue after dissolution only for the purpose of winding
up.
(b) In winding up a decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association, the members:
(i) Shall discharge the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association's debts, obligations
and other liabilities, settle and close the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association's business and
distribute any remaining property:
(A) As required by state law other than
this chapter or federal law requiring assets of an a
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association to be
distributed to another entity or person with similar
nonprofit purposes;
(B) In accordance with the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association's governing
principles. In the absence of applicable governing
principles, to the current members of the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association in proportion to their
membership interests; or
16

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0022
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(C) If neither subdivision subparagraph (A)
or (B) of this paragraph applies, in accordance with the
law of unclaimed property contained in W.S. 34-24-101
through 34-24-140.
(ii) May:
(A) Authorize an administrator to wind up
the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association in
accordance with W.S. 17-32-120. Any administrator so
authorized shall owe the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association a duty of care in the conduct or
winding up of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association to refrain from grossly negligent or reckless
conduct, willful or intentional misconduct or a knowing
violation of the law;
(B) Preserve the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association's operations and
property as a going concern for a reasonable time;
(D) Transfer the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association's property;
(iii) If the members of a decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association do not appoint an
administrator or administrators to wind up the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association, the
members shall owe the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association a duty of care in the conduct or
winding up of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association's operations to refrain from engaging in
grossly negligent or reckless conduct, willful or
intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of the law.
17

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0022
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
17-32-127. Mergers.
(a) As used in this section:
(vii) "Charitable purpose" means any purpose of
an organization that is recognized as exempt under section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code or any successor
section, or that upon dissolution shall distribute its
assets to a public benefit corporation, the United States,
a state or a person that is recognized as exempt under
section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code or any
successor section.
(c) A merger involving a decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association is subject to the following
requirements:
(iii) The plan of merger shall be approved by
the members of each decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association that is a constituent organization in the
merger, subject to W.S. 17-32-120. If a member of a
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association that is
party to a merger will have personal liability with respect
to an obligation of a constituent or surviving
organization, the consent in a record of that member to the
plan of merger shall also be obtained;
(v) Following approval of the plan, a merger
under this section shall be effective if:
(B) The surviving organization is a
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association, as
specified in the plan of merger and upon compliance by any
constituent organization that is not a decentralized
18

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0022
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
unincorporated nonprofit association with any requirements,
including any required filings in the office of the
secretary of state, of the organization's governing
statute; or
(d) When a merger becomes effective:
(viii) The merger shall not affect the personal
liability, if any, of a member, administrator or manager of
a constituent association for a debt, liability or
obligation of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association incurred before the merger is effective; and
17-32-128. Conversion of entities.
A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association may
effect a conversion by complying with the applicable
provisions of W.S. 17-26-101 and any applicable provisions
of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association's
governing principles.
Section 2. W.S. 17-32-102(a)(ii) is repealed.
19

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0022
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
20